DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-71

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6XK-01

DTC C 1242 /42 IG2 Power Source Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

*Batt
With the vehicle running, open circuit in IG2 is detected for arery
C1242/42 «ICregulator

more than 7 sec. L
* Power source circuit

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the power source circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and prohibits

ABS & BA & TRC & VSC controls and the brake system becomes normal.
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DI-72 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-73
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkbattery voltage.

OK:
Voltage: 10 - 14V

@

2 | Check voltage of the ECU IG power source.

NG> Check and repair the charging system.

Incaseofusingthehand -heldtester:

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and pushthe hand -heldtester main switch ON.

(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Checkthe voltage condition output from the ECU displayed onthe hand -heldtester.
OK:

”Normal” is displayed.

Incaseofnotusingthehand -heldtester:
ON PREPARATION:
@ GND2 Remove ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU with connectors still con-
GND1 (IG1  GND3 h nected.
G (@) Turn the ignition switch ON.
\M/V (b) Measure voltage between terminals 1G2 and GND of ABS
G(N)D4/\ ) & BA & TRC & VSC ECU connector.
Q// - o Voltage:
F09165 ge: 10-14V

ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.

0K> Turn ignition switch OFF, check and replace
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DI-74 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

3 | Check continuity between terminal GND of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU connec-
tor and body ground.

GND1 GND2 GND3 GND4 CHECK:
/ Measure resistance between terminal GND of ABS & BA& TRC
Z—slz = s z—s & VSC ECU connector and body ground.
LII_ILILlu ON//D02” 00000 /20 0000L
”” H”HHHHn Slelealalya ) DA0 00600500 - 05) OK:

WW VV Resistance: 1 Q or less

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

Check for open circuit in harness and connector between ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and bat-
tery (See page IN-35).
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